Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.070

Application for licensure—Fee.

An application for licensing shall be filed with the director on a form provided by the director and must contain statements made under oath demonstrating the applicant's education and practical experience. The director may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for licensing. The application fee for initial licensing shall be determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086. The application, together with the fee, must be submitted to the department prior to the application deadline established by the director. Fees for initial licensing shall include the examination and issuance of a certificate. If the director finds an applicant ineligible for licensing, the fee shall be retained as an application fee.

[ 2000 c 253 s 8.]